Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-414
Health care practitioner facility, defined.

Health care practitioner facility means the residence, office, or clinic of a practitioner or group of practitioners credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act or any distinct part of such residence, office, or clinic.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1179.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.